Florida, session 2026, HB73.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) is added to section 20.32,
Florida Statutes, to read:
20.32 Florida Commission on Offender Review.—
(4)(a) For the purpose of assisting a person who has been
disqualified from voting based on a felony conviction other than
murder or a felony sexual offense in determining whether he or
she has met the requirements under s. 98.0751 and had his or her
voting rights restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of the State
Constitution, the commission shall develop and maintain a
database that contains for each such person all of the following
information:
1. His or her name and any other personal identifying
information.
2. The remaining length of any term of supervision,
including, but not limited to, probation, community control, or
parole, ordered by a court as a part of his or her sentence.
3. The remaining amount of any restitution owed to a
victim as ordered by a court as a part of his or her sentence.
4. The remaining amount due of any fines or fees that were
initially ordered by a court as a part of his or her sentence or
as a condition of any form of supervision, including, but not
limited to, probation, community control, or parole.
5. The completion status of any other term ordered by a
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb73-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 73 2026
court as a part of his or her sentence.
6. Any other information needed to determine whether he or
she has met the requirements for restoration of voting rights
under s. 98.0751.
(b) Each month, the Department of State, the Department of
Corrections, the clerks of the circuit courts, the county
comptrollers, and the Board of Executive Clemency shall provide
to the commission any information held by such governmental
entity which is required under paragraph (a).
(c) The Department of Management Services, acting through
the Florida Digital Service, shall provide any technical
assistance necessary for the commission to develop and maintain
the database. The Department of Management Services may adopt
rules to provide such assistance.
(d) By July 1, 2029, the commission shall make available
to the public the database on an Internet website. The
commission must update the database monthly with the information
received under paragraph (b). The commission shall publish on
the website clear instructions that a person who has been
disqualified from voting based on a felony conviction other than
murder or a felony sexual offense may follow to have his or her
voting rights restored and to register to vote.
(e) By July 1, 2027, the commission shall provide to the
Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives a comprehensive plan that includes the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb73-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 73 2026
following:
1. The governmental entities from which and the methods by
which the commission shall collect, centralize, analyze, and
secure the information required to be included in the database.
2. A description of any infrastructure and services,
including, but not limited to, software, hardware, and
information technology services, that may be necessary to create
and maintain the database.
3. The anticipated number of additional employees
necessary for:
a. The commission to develop and maintain the database.
b. A governmental entity to provide the information
required under paragraph (b).
c. The Florida Digital Service to provide the assistance
required under paragraph (c).
4. The anticipated cost to initially develop the database,
annual cost to maintain the database, and annual appropriation
required to fund the anticipated costs of the commission, each
governmental entity, and the Florida Digital Service.
5. Any legal authority necessary for the commission to
develop and maintain the database.
6. Prepare proposed legislation to implement the
comprehensive plan.
(f) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person who
100 registers to vote or who votes in reasonable reliance on
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb73-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 73 2026
101 information contained in the database indicating that his or her
102 voting rights have been restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of
103 the State Constitution has an affirmative right to register and
104 to vote and may not be charged with a violation of any criminal
105 law of this state relating to fraudulently voting or registering
106 to vote.
107 (g) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this
108 subsection.
109 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb73-00